Illinois, session 104th, HB3820.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Worker Adjustment and Retraining 5Notification Act is amended by adding Section 11 as follows: 6    (820 ILCS 65/11 new)7    Sec. 11. Severance pay required. 8    (a) An employer shall provide severance pay to a 9terminated employee equal to one week of pay for each full year 10of employment. If the employer provides any employee with less 11than the number of days of notification required under Section 1210, the employer shall provide that employee with an 13additional 4 weeks of pay. The rate of severance pay provided 14by the employer under this Section shall be the average 15regular rate of compensation received during the employee's 16preceding 3 years of employment with the employer or the final 17regular rate of compensation paid to the employee, whichever 18rate is higher.19    (b) Severance under this Section shall be considered 20compensation due to an employee for back pay and losses 21associated with the termination of the employment relationship 22and earned in full upon the termination of the employment 23relationship, notwithstanding the calculation of the amount of   HB3820- 2 -LRB104 12265 SPS 22377 b1the payment with reference to the employee's length of 2service.3    (c) An employer shall provide an employee the greater of:4        (1) the severance pay required under this subdivision; 5    or6        (2) any severance pay provided by the employer under a 7    collective bargaining agreement or for any other reason.8    (d) Any back pay provided by the employer to an employee 9under the Worker Adjustment and Retraining Notification Act, 1029 U.S.C. Section 2101 et seq., shall be credited towards the 11severance pay requirements described in this Section.12    (e) No waiver of the right to severance provided under 13this Section shall be effective without approval of the waiver 14by the Director of Labor or by a court of competent 15jurisdiction.